Washington statutes.
RCW 10.61.035

Conviction or acquittal—Several defendants.

Upon an indictment or information against several defendants any one or more may be convicted or acquitted.

[ 1891 c 28 s 37; Code 1881 s 1022; 1873 p 228 s 205; 1869 p 243 s 200; RRS s 2073. Formerly RCW 10.61.030, part.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: This section superseded in part by CrR 6.16. See comment after CrR 6.16.

Discharging defendant to give evidence: RCW 10.46.110.